Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 16 Estrays

4-16-1.
Taking up on private land.

If any person finds any horse, neat-beast, sheep, or hog on his or her land doing damage, not knowing to whom the animal belongs, he or she may take the animal as an estray, and within two (2) days report the estray to the city or town clerk of the city or town in which the animal was found.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-1

.

4-16-2.
Notice and publication of estrays.

The city or town clerk shall give three (3) notices, attested under his or her hand, setting forth the natural and artificial marks of the animal, one of which notices he or she shall cause to be set up in a public place in the city or town and the other two (2) notices in public places in the several adjoining cities or towns in the state, and also cause the notices to be published in one of the newspapers published in the several adjoining cities or towns to that in which the estray was found.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-2

.

4-16-3.
Retention of estrays by taker.

Every estrayed animal taken up shall be kept by the person who took it up thirty (30) days. If it is a horse, the person shall have a withe kept about the horse’s neck the whole of that time.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-3

.

4-16-4.
Reclaimer of estrays by owner.

Any person claiming an estrayed animal may, at any time within thirty (30) days, claim the animal by paying the just and reasonable charges of keeping and notifying provided in §

4-16-3

over and above the actual benefit derived from the use of the animal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-4

.

4-16-5.
Settlement of disputes as to maintenance charges.

In case any difference arises between the parties about the charge of keeping an estrayed animal, the dispute may be referred to the district court having jurisdiction in the city or town, which shall hear and determine the dispute and tax costs as in other cases.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-5

.

4-16-6.
Appraisal — Sale of unclaimed animals.

In case no owner appears within thirty (30) days, the person who took up the animal shall go to the city or town clerk, taking with him or her two (2) electors of the neighborhood whom the city or town clerk shall engage to make a faithful and true appraisal of the animal, and the person who took up the animal shall pay the sum the animal shall be appraised at, after all just charges are deducted, into the hands of the city or town clerk. If the person fails to pay the appraised amount, the animal shall be sold at public auction after reasonable notice under the direction of the city or town clerk for the payment of those charges, and in either case the balance shall be retained for the use of the owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-6

.

4-16-7.
Penalty for failure to proceed as required.

Any person taking up any estrayed animal and not proceeding as required by this chapter shall forfeit twenty-five dollars ($25.00), one half (1/2) to the use of the city or town where the offense has been committed and one half (1/2) to the use of him or her who shall sue for it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-7

.

4-16-8.
Use of animal by taker pending reclaim.

The person who shall take up any estrayed animal may lawfully use the animal during the time it may be in his or her possession, after he or she has given notice thereof to the city or town clerk as required in §

4-16-1

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-8

.

4-16-9.
Clerk’s records — Fees.

Every city or town clerk shall keep a fair record of all his or her proceedings under this chapter, and shall pay all moneys by him or her received for any estrays and for which no owner appears, into the city or town treasury immediately on receipt. The city or town clerk shall be paid twenty-five cents (25¢) for every notice posted or printed; and if no owner appears, and the estray is appraised, and he or she gives a certificate, he or she shall have twenty-five cents (25¢) of the fees.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-9

.

4-16-10.
Limited application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not extend to any city or town where other provisions on this subject are made by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 130, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 156, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 186, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 644, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-16-10

.

4-16-11.
Use of the terms owner or guardian.

Wherever the word “owner” shall appear in this chapter it shall also mean and may be interchanged with the word “guardian” as defined in §

4-1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 9.